Florida, session 2026, SB906.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 158 159 Section 1.âSection 720.3024, Florida Statutes, is created 160 to read: 161 720.3024âOffice of the Homeownersâ Association Ombudsman.â 162 (1)âADMINISTRATION; APPOINTMENT; LOCATION.â 163 (a)âThere is created the Office of the Homeownersâ 164 Association Ombudsman to be located, for administrative 165 purposes, within the Division of Florida Condominiums, 166 Timeshares, and Mobile Homes of the Department of Business and 167 Professional Regulation. The functions of the office shall be 168 funded by the General Appropriations Act. 169 (b)âThe Governor shall appoint the ombudsman. The ombudsman 170 must be an attorney admitted to practice before the Florida 171 Supreme Court and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. 172 The ombudsman, or an officer or a full-time employee of the 173 ombudsmanâs office, may not actively engage in any other 174 business or profession that directly or indirectly relates to or 175 conflicts with his or her work in the ombudsmanâs office; serve 176 as the representative or an executive, officer, or employee of 177 any political party, executive committee, or other governing 178 body of a political party; receive remuneration for activities 179 on behalf of any candidate for public office; or engage in 180 soliciting votes or other activities on behalf of a candidate 181 for public office. The ombudsman, an officer, or a full-time 182 employee of the ombudsmanâs office may not become a candidate 183 for election to public office unless he or she first resigns 184 from his or her office or employment. 185 (c)âThe ombudsman shall maintain his or her principal 186 office at a location convenient to the department, which will 187 enable the ombudsman to carry out expeditiously the duties and 188 functions of his or her office. The ombudsman may establish 189 branch offices elsewhere in this state upon the concurrence of 190 the Governor. 191 (2)âPOWERS AND DUTIES.âThe ombudsman has the powers 192 necessary to carry out the duties of his or her office, 193 including, but not limited to: 194 (a)âHaving access to and use of all files and records of 195 the division. 196 (b)âEmploying professional and clerical staff as necessary 197 for the efficient operation of the office. 198 (c)âPreparing and issuing reports and recommendations to 199 the Governor, the department, the President of the Senate, and 200 the Speaker of the House of Representatives on any matter or 201 subject within the jurisdiction of this chapter. 202 (d)âActing as a liaison between the department, parcel 203 owners, boards of directors, board members, community 204 association managers, and other affected parties. The ombudsman 205 shall develop policies and procedures to assist parcel owners, 206 boards of directors, board members, community association 207 managers, and other affected parties in understanding their 208 rights and responsibilities as set forth in this chapter and in 209 the governing documents of their respective associations. The 210 ombudsman shall coordinate and assist in the preparation and 211 adoption of educational and reference materials and shall 212 endeavor to coordinate with private or volunteer providers of 213 such services so that the availability of such resources is made 214 known to the largest possible audience. 215 (e)âMonitoring and reviewing procedures and disputes 216 concerning association elections or meetings, including, but not 217 limited to, recommending that the division pursue enforcement 218 action in any manner if there is reasonable cause to believe 219 that election misconduct has occurred and reviewing secret 220 ballots cast at a vote of the association. 221 (f)âMaking recommendations to the division for changes in 222 rules and procedures for the filing, investigation, and 223 resolution of complaints filed by parcel owners, associations, 224 or managers. 225 (g)âProviding resources to assist members of boards of 226 directors and officers of associations to carry out their powers 227 and duties consistent with this chapter and the governing 228 documents of their respective associations. 229 (h)âEncouraging and facilitating voluntary meetings between 230 parcel owners, boards of directors, board members, community 231 association managers, and other affected parties when the 232 meetings may assist in resolving a dispute within a homeownersâ 233 association before a person submits a dispute for a formal or 234 administrative remedy. The ombudsman shall act as a neutral 235 resource for the rights and responsibilities of parcel owners, 236 associations, and board members. 237 (i)âAssisting with the resolution of disputes between 238 parcel owners and their association, or between parcel owners, 239 if applicable. 240 (j)âAppointing an election monitor. 241 (3)âELECTION MONITORING.â 242 (a)âFifteen percent of the total voting interests in a 243 homeownersâ association, or six parcel owners, whichever is 244 greater, may petition the ombudsman to appoint an election 245 monitor to attend the annual meeting of the parcel owners and 246 conduct the election of directors. 247 (b)âThe ombudsman shall appoint a division employee, a 248 person who specializes in homeownersâ association election 249 monitoring, or an attorney licensed to practice in this state as 250 the election monitor. 251 (c)âThe association shall pay all costs associated with the 252 election monitoring process. 253 (d)âThe division shall adopt rules establishing procedures 254 for the appointment of election monitors and the scope of the 255 monitorâs role in the election process, and essential duties 256 therein. 257 Section 2.âSection 720.3025, Florida Statutes, is created 258 to read: 259 720.3025âAuthority, responsibility, and duties of Division 260 of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes.â 261 (1)âThe division may enforce and ensure compliance with 262 this chapter and rules relating to the development, 263 construction, sale, lease, ownership, operation, and management 264 of residential parcels and complaints. In performing its duties, 265 the division has complete jurisdiction to investigate complaints 266 and enforce compliance with respect to associations that are 267 still under developer control involving improper turnover or 268 failure to turn over under s. 720.307. However, after turnover 269 has occurred, the division has jurisdiction to review records 270 and investigate complaints related only to: 271 (a)1.âProcedural aspects and records relating to financial 272 issues, including annual financial reporting under ss. 273 720.303(7) and 720.3086; assessments for common expenses, fines, 274 and commingling of reserve and operating funds under s. 275 720.303(8); use of debit cards for unintended purposes under s. 276 720.303(13); the annual operating budget and the allocation of 277 reserve funds under s. 720.303(6); financial records under s. 278 720.303(4)(a)10.; and any other record necessary to determine 279 the revenues and expenses of the association. 280 2.âElections, including election and voting requirements 281 under ss. 720.303(2) and 720.306, recall of board members under 282 s. 720.303(10), electronic voting under s. 720.317, and 283 elections that occur during an emergency under s. 720.316(1)(a). 284 3.âThe maintenance of and parcel owner access to 285 association records under s. 720.303(4). 286 4.âThe procedural aspects of meetings, including parcel 287 owner meetings, quorums, voting requirements, proxies, board of 288 administration meetings, budget meetings, and the right to speak 289 at such meetings under s. 720.303(2) and s. 720.306. 290 5.âThe disclosure of conflicts of interest under s. 291 720.3033(6). 292 6.âThe removal of a board member or officer under ss. 293 720.3033(3) and (4). 294 7.âAny written inquiry by parcel owners to the association 295 relating to such matters, including written inquiries. 296 8.âThe requirement under s. 720.3033(5) for associations to 297 maintain an insurance policy or fidelity bonding for all persons 298 who control or disperse funds of the association. 299 9.âBoard member education requirements under s. 300 720.3033(1). 301 (b)1.âThe division may conduct necessary public or private 302 investigations within or outside this state to determine whether 303 any person has violated this chapter or any rule or order 304 hereunder, to aid in the enforcement of this chapter, or to aid 305 in the adoption of rules or forms. 306 2.âThe division may submit any official written report, 307 worksheet, or other related paper, or a duly certified copy 308 thereof, compiled, prepared, drafted, or otherwise made and duly 309 authenticated by a financial examiner or analyst to be admitted 310 as competent evidence in any hearing in which the financial 311 examiner or analyst is available for cross-examination and 312 attests under oath that such documents were prepared as a result 313 of an examination or inspection conducted pursuant to this 314 chapter. 315 (c)âThe division may require or authorize any person to 316 file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise, as the 317 division determines, as to the facts and circumstances 318 concerning a matter being investigated. 319 (d)âFor the purpose of any investigation under this 320 chapter, the division director or any officer or employee 321 designated by the division director may administer oaths or 322 affirmations, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, 323 take evidence, and require the production of any matter which is 324 relevant to the investigation, including the existence, 325 description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any 326 book, document, or other tangible thing and the identity and 327 location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any 328 other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of 329 material evidence. Upon the failure by a person to obey a 330 subpoena or to answer questions propounded by the investigating 331 officer and upon reasonable notice to all affected persons, the 332 division may apply to the circuit court for an order compelling 333 compliance. 334 (e)âNotwithstanding any remedy available to parcel owners 335 and associations, if the division has reasonable cause to 336 believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter or 337 related rule has occurred, the division may institute 338 enforcement proceedings in its own name against any developer, 339 association, officer, or member of the board of administration, 340 or its assignees or agents, as follows: 341 1.âThe division may permit a person whose conduct or 342 actions may be under investigation to waive formal proceedings 343 and enter into a consent proceeding whereby orders, rules, or 344 letters of censure or warning, whether formal or informal, may 345 be entered against the person. 346 2.âThe division may issue an order requiring the developer, 347 association, developer-designated officer, or developer 348 designated member of the board of administration, developer 349 designated assignees or agents, community association manager, 350 or community association management firm to cease and desist 351 from the unlawful practice and take such affirmative action as 352 in the judgment of the division will carry out the purposes of 353 this chapter. If the division finds that a developer, an 354 association, an officer, or a member of the board of 355 administration, or its assignees or agents, is violating or is 356 about to violate any provision of this chapter, any rule adopted 357 or order issued by the division, or any written agreement 358 entered into with the division, and presents an immediate danger 359 to the public requiring an immediate final order, it may issue 360 an emergency cease and desist order reciting with particularity 361 the facts underlying such findings. The emergency cease and 362 desist order is effective for 90 days. If the division begins 363 nonemergency cease and desist proceedings, the emergency cease 364 and desist order remains effective until the conclusion of the 365 proceedings under ss. 120.569 and 120.57. 366 3.âIf a developer fails to pay any restitution determined 367 by the division to be owed, plus any accrued interest at the 368 highest rate permitted by law, within 30 days after expiration 369 of any appellate time period of a final order requiring payment 370 of restitution or the conclusion of any appeal thereof, 371 whichever is later, the division must bring an action in circuit 372 or county court on behalf of any association, class of parcel 373 owners, lessees, or purchasers for restitution, declaratory 374 relief, injunctive relief, or any other available remedy. 375 4.âThe division may petition the court for appointment of a 376 receiver or conservator. If appointed, the receiver or 377 conservator may take action to implement the court order to 378 ensure the performance of the order and to remedy any breach 379 thereof. In addition to all other means provided by law for the 380 enforcement of an injunction or a temporary restraining order, 381 the circuit court may impound or sequester the property of a 382 party defendant, including books, papers, documents, and related 383 records, and allow the examination and use of the property by 384 the division and a court-appointed receiver or conservator. 385 5.âThe division may apply to the circuit court for an order 386 of restitution whereby the defendant in an action brought under 387 subparagraph 3. is ordered to make restitution of those sums 388 shown by the division to have been obtained by the defendant in 389 violation of this chapter. At the option of the court, such 390 restitution is payable to the conservator or receiver appointed 391 under subparagraph 4. or directly to the persons whose funds or 392 assets were obtained in violation of this chapter. 393 6.âThe division may impose a civil penalty against a 394 developer, or an association or its assignee or agent, for any 395 violation of this chapter or related rule. The division may 396 impose a civil penalty individually against an officer or a 397 board member who willfully and knowingly violates this chapter, 398 an adopted rule, or a final order of the division; may order the 399 removal of such individual as an officer or a member of the 400 board of administration or as an officer of the association; and 401 may prohibit such individual from serving as an officer or a 402 member of the board of a community association for a period of 403 time. The term âwillfully and knowinglyâ means that the division 404 informed the officer or board member that his or her action or 405 intended action violates this chapter, a rule adopted under this 406 chapter, or a final order of the division and that the officer 407 or board member refused to comply with the requirements of this 408 chapter, a rule adopted under this chapter, or a final order of 409 the division. The division, before initiating formal agency 410 action under chapter 120, must provide the officer or board 411 member an opportunity to voluntarily comply, and an officer or 412 board member who complies within 10 days after notification is 413 not subject to a civil penalty. A penalty may be imposed on the 414 basis of each day of continuing violation, but the penalty for 415 any offense may not exceed $5,000. The division shall adopt by 416 rule penalty guidelines applicable to possible violations or to 417 categories of violations of this chapter or rules adopted by the 418 division. The guidelines must specify a meaningful range of 419 civil penalties for each such violation of the law and rules and 420 must be based upon the harm caused by the violation, upon the 421 repetition of the violation, and upon such other factors deemed 422 relevant by the division, including, but not limited to, whether 423 the violations were committed by a developer or an owner 424 controlled association, the size of the association, and the 425 duration of the violations. The guidelines must designate the 426 possible mitigating or aggravating circumstances that justify a 427 departure from the range of penalties provided by the rules. It 428 is the legislative intent that minor violations be distinguished 429 from those which endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the 430 homeownersâ association residents or other persons and that such 431 guidelines provide reasonable and meaningful notice to the 432 public of likely penalties that may be imposed for proscribed 433 conduct. This subsection does not limit the ability of the 434 division to informally dispose of administrative actions or 435 complaints by stipulation, agreed settlement, or consent order. 436 All amounts collected must be deposited with the Chief Financial 437 Officer to the credit of the Division of Florida Condominiums, 438 Timeshares, and Mobile Homes Trust Fund. If a developer fails to 439 pay the civil penalty and the amount deemed to be owed to the 440 association, the division must issue an order directing that 441 such developer cease and desist from further operation until 442 such time as the civil penalty is paid, or the division may 443 pursue enforcement of the penalty in a court of competent 444 jurisdiction. If an association fails to pay the civil penalty, 445 the division must pursue enforcement in a court of competent 446 jurisdiction, and the order imposing the civil penalty or the 447 cease and desist order is not effective until 20 days after the 448 date of such order. Any action commenced by the division must be 449 brought in the county in which the division has its executive 450 offices or in the county in which the violation occurred. 451 7.âIf a parcel owner presents the division with proof that 452 the parcel owner has requested access to official records in 453 writing by certified mail, and that after 10 days the parcel 454 owner has again made the same request for access to official 455 records in writing by certified mail, and that more than 10 days 456 have elapsed since the second request and the association has 457 still failed or refused to provide access to official records as 458 required by this chapter, the division must issue a subpoena 459 requiring production of the requested records at the location in 460 which the records are kept pursuant to s. 720.303. Upon receipt 461 of the records, the division must provide to the parcel owner 462 who was denied access to such records the produced official 463 records without charge. 464 8.âIn addition to subparagraph 6., the division may seek 465 the imposition of a civil penalty through the circuit court for 466 any violation for which the division may issue a notice to show 467 cause under paragraph (o). The civil penalty must be at least 468 $500 but no more than $5,000 for each violation. The court may 469 also award to the prevailing party court costs and reasonable 470 attorney fees and, if the division prevails, may also award 471 reasonable costs of investigation. 472 9.âThe division may issue citations and adopt rules to 473 provide for citation bases and citation procedures in accordance 474 with this paragraph. 475 (f)âThe division may adopt rules to administer and enforce 476 this chapter. 477 (g)âThe division shall provide training and educational 478 programs for homeownersâ association board members and parcel 479 owners. The training and education may, in the divisionâs 480 discretion, include web-based electronic media and live training 481 and seminars in various locations throughout this state. The 482 division may review and approve education and training programs 483 for board members and parcel owners offered by providers and 484 shall maintain a current list of approved programs and providers 485 and make such list available to board members and parcel owners 486 in a reasonable and cost-effective manner. The division shall 487 provide the division-approved provider with the template 488 certificate for issuance directly to an associationâs board 489 members who have satisfactorily completed the requirements under 490 s. 720.306. The division shall adopt rules to implement this 491 paragraph. 492 (h)âThe division shall maintain a toll-free telephone 493 number accessible to parcel owners. 494 (i)âIf a complaint is made, the division must conduct its 495 inquiry with due regard for the interests of the affected 496 parties. Within 30 days after receipt of a complaint, the 497 division shall acknowledge the complaint in writing and notify 498 the complainant whether the complaint is within the jurisdiction 499 of the division and whether the division needs additional 500 information from the complainant. The division shall conduct its 501 investigation and, within 90 days after receipt of the original 502 complaint or requested additional information, take action upon 503 the complaint. However, the failure to complete the 504 investigation within 90 days does not prevent the division from 505 continuing its investigation, accepting or considering evidence 506 obtained or received after 90 days, or taking administrative 507 action if reasonable cause exists to believe that a violation of 508 this chapter or a rule has occurred. If an investigation is not 509 completed within the time limits established in this paragraph, 510 the division must, on a monthly basis, notify the complainant in 511 writing of the status of the investigation. When reporting its 512 action to the complainant, the division shall inform the 513 complainant of any right to a hearing under ss. 120.569 and 514 120.57. The division may adopt rules regarding the submission of 515 a complaint against an association. 516 (j)âHomeownersâ association directors, officers, and 517 employees; developers; community association managers; and 518 community association management firms have an ongoing duty to 519 reasonably cooperate with the division in any investigation 520 under this section. The division shall refer to local law 521 enforcement authorities any person who the division believes has 522 altered, destroyed, concealed, or removed any record, document, 523 or thing required to be kept or maintained by this chapter with 524 the purpose to impair its veracity or availability in the 525 divisionâs investigation. The division shall refer to local law 526 enforcement authorities any person who the division believes has 527 engaged in fraud, theft, embezzlement, or other criminal 528 activity or when the division has cause to believe that fraud, 529 theft, embezzlement, or other criminal activity has occurred. 530 (k)âThe division director or any officer or employee of the 531 division and the homeowners association ombudsman or any 532 employee of the Office of the Homeownersâ Association Ombudsman 533 may attend and observe any meeting of the board of 534 administration or any parcel owner meeting, including any 535 meeting of a subcommittee or special committee, which is open to 536 members of the association for the purpose of performing the 537 duties of the division or the Office of the Homeownersâ 538 Association Ombudsman under this chapter. 539 (l)âThe division may: 540 1.âContract with agencies in this state or other 541 jurisdictions to perform investigative functions; or 542 2.âAccept grants-in-aid from any source. 543 (m)âThe division shall cooperate with similar agencies in 544 other jurisdictions to establish uniform filing procedures and 545 forms, public offering statements, advertising standards, and 546 rules and common administrative practices. 547 (n)âThe division shall consider notice to a developer to be 548 complete when it is delivered to the address of the developer 549 currently on file with the division. 550 (o)âIn addition to its enforcement authority, the division 551 may issue a notice to show cause, which must provide for a 552 hearing, upon written request, in accordance with chapter 120. 553 (p)âIf the division receives a complaint regarding access 554 to official records on the associationâs website or through an 555 application that can be downloaded on a mobile device under s. 556 720.303(2)(c)1., the division may request access to the 557 associationâs website or application and investigate. The 558 division may adopt rules to carry out this paragraph. 559 (2)âOn the certification form provided by the division, the 560 directors of the association shall certify that each director of 561 the association has completed the written certification and 562 educational certificate requirements in s. 720.3033(1). This 563 certification requirement does not apply to the directors of an 564 association governing a timeshare property. Each homeownersâ 565 association shall create and maintain an online account with the 566 division, as required in subsection (3). 567 (3)âOn or before October 1, 2027, all homeownersâ 568 associations shall create and maintain an online account with 569 the division and provide information requested by the division 570 in an electronic format determined by the division. The division 571 shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. The division may 572 require homeownersâ associations to provide such information no 573 more than once per year, except that the division may require 574 homeownersâ associations to update the contact information in 575 paragraph (a) within 30 days after any change. The division 576 shall provide a homeownersâ association at least a 45-day notice 577 of any requirement to provide any information after the 578 homeownersâ association initially creates an online account. The 579 information that the division may require from homeownersâ 580 associations is limited to: 581 (a)âContact information for the association which includes: 582 1.âThe name of the association. 583 2.âThe physical address of the homeownersâ association 584 property. 585 3.âThe mailing address and county of the association. 586 4.âThe e-mail address and telephone number for the 587 association. 588 5.âThe name and board title for each member of the 589 associationâs board. 590 6.âThe name and contact information of the associationâs 591 community association manager or community association 592 management firm, if applicable. 593 7.âThe hyperlink or website address of the associationâs 594 website, if applicable. 595 (b)âThe total number of buildings, and for each building in 596 the association: 597 1.âThe total number of stories, including both habitable 598 and uninhabitable stories. 599 2.âThe total number of parcels. 600 3.âThe age of each building, based on the certificate of 601 occupancy. 602 4.âAny construction commenced within the common elements 603 during the most recent calendar year. 604 (c)âThe associationâs assessments, including: 605 1.âThe amount of assessment or special assessment by parcel 606 type, including reserves. 607 2.âThe purpose of the assessment or special assessment. 608 3.âThe name of the financial institution or institutions 609 with which the association maintains accounts. 610 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.